Hawaii statutes.
[§486P-7] Use and disclosure of
information. The information received by the attorney general under this
chapter shall be used only for purposes of enforcement of this chapter, chapter
245, and chapter 675; provided that the attorney general may share any
information with authorities of other states or the federal government for the
purpose of enforcement of similar state statutes upon receipt of adequate
assurance from those authorities that the information will be used only for
that purpose.

Information received by the attorney general
under this chapter that tends to identify customers of tobacco product
manufacturers, terms of sale, including price, and nonaggregated sales volume
data, shall be exempt from disclosure under section 92F-11. [L 2003, c 77, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next